Ohio, session 136, HB924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 120.09, 120.091, and 120.092 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 120.09. (A) The court-appointed public defender loan repayment program is created, which shall be administered by the state public defender. The purpose of the program is to provide loan repayment on behalf of attorneys who agree to employment as court-appointed counsel under division (E) of section 120.16 or division (E) of section 120.26 of the Revised Code. (B) Under the program, the state public defender shall agree to repay up to fifty thousand dollars of a government or other educational loan taken by an individual if the individual has met all of the requirements under section 120.091 of the Revised Code and if the expenses were incurred while the individual was enrolled in a law school in the United States that was, during the time enrolled, accredited by the American bar association, or a law school located outside the United States for which the individual received a foreign equivalency evaluation. (C) The state public defender, in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules as necessary to implement and administer sections 120.09 to 120.092 of the Revised Code, including all of the following: (1) The application described in section 120.091 of the Revised Code; (2) A method to verify an applicant's information; (3) A method to receive and review questions regarding the program from the general public. (D) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Sec. 120.091. (A) An individual who meets all of the following requirements may apply for loan repayment under the court-appointed public defender loan repayment program: (1) The individual is employed under division (E) of section 120.16 or division (E) of section 120.26 of the Revised Code for at least one thousand hours per year for a period of either of the following: (a) Ten consecutive years; (b) Fifteen nonconsecutive years during a twenty-year period. (2) The individual is not enrolled in any other state or federally funded student loan repayment or debt forgiveness program, including the "John R. Justice Prosecutors and Defenders Incentive Act of 2008," 34 U.S.C. 10671 et seq., or the rural practice incentive program established under section 3333.131 of the Revised Code. (3) The individual has made monthly payments that are described by all of the following: (a) Made after October 1, 2007; (b) For the full amount due, as shown on the bill; (c) Paid not later than fifteen days after the due date; (d) Made during the individual's employment under division (E) of section 120.16 or division (E) of section 120.26 of the Revised Code. (B) An application for loan repayment under the court-appointed public defender loan repayment program shall be submitted to the state public defender on a form that the state public defender shall prescribe. The individual shall submit the following information with an application: (1) The individual's name, permanent address or address at which the individual is currently residing if different from the permanent address, and telephone number; (2) The individual's employer under division (E) of section 120.16 or division (E) of section 120.26 of the Revised Code; (3) A summary and verification of the educational expenses for which the individual seeks reimbursement under the program; (4) Verification that the individual has been admitted to the practice of law in this state by the supreme court and remains in good standing. Sec. 120.092. The court-appointed public defender loan repayment fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of all money awarded to the state by donation, gift, or bequest and all other money received for the implementation and administration of sections 120.09 to 120.092 of the Revised Code. The state public defender shall use the fund for the implementation and administration of sections 120.09 to 120.092 of the Revised Code.